North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 13. Prevention of Abuse and Neglect.

§ 7B-1300.
Purpose.

It is the expressed intent of this Article to make the prevention of abuse and neglect, as defined in

G.S. 7B-101

, a priority of this State and to establish the Children’s Trust Fund as a means to that end.

History.

1983, c. 894, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6.

Cross References.

As to establishment of School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative, see note under G.S. 143B-366.

§ 7B-1301.
Program on Prevention of Abuse and Neglect.

The Department of Health and Human Services, through the Division of Social Services, shall implement the Program on Prevention of Abuse and Neglect. The Division of Social Services shall provide the staff and support services for implementing this program.

In order to carry out the purposes of this Article:

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 10.43(b), effective July 1, 2009.

The Division of Social Services shall review applications and contract with public or private nonprofit organizations, agencies, schools, or with qualified individuals to operate community-based educational and service programs designed to prevent the occurrence of abuse and neglect. Every contract entered into by the Division of Social Services shall contain provisions that at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total funding required for a program be provided by the administering organization in the form of in-kind or other services and that a mechanism for evaluation of services provided under the contract be included in the services to be performed. In addition, every proposal to the Division of Social Services for funding under this Article shall include assurances that the proposal has been forwarded to the local department of social services for comment so that the Division of Social Services may consider coordination and duplication of effort on the local level.

The Division of Social Services shall develop appropriate guidelines and criteria for awarding contracts under this Article. These criteria shall include, but are not limited to: documentation of need within the proposed geographical impact area; diversity of geographical areas of programs funded under this Article; demonstrated effectiveness of the proposed strategy or program for preventing abuse and neglect; reasonableness of implementation plan for achieving stated objectives; utilization of community resources including volunteers; provision for an evaluation component that will provide outcome data; plan for dissemination of the program for implementation in other communities; and potential for future funding from private sources.

The Division of Social Services shall develop guidelines for regular monitoring of contracts awarded under this Article in order to maximize the investments in prevention programs by the Children’s Trust Fund and to establish appropriate accountability measures for administration of contracts.

The Division of Social Services shall develop a State plan for the prevention of abuse and neglect for submission to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

To assist in implementing this Article, the Division of Social Services may accept contributions, grants, or gifts in cash or otherwise from persons, associations, or corporations. All monies received by the Division of Social Services from contributions, grants, or gifts and not through appropriation by the General Assembly shall be deposited in the Children’s Trust Fund. Disbursements of the funds shall be on the authorization of the Department of Health and Human Services. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the funds are subject in all respects to State law and regulations, but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of the funds.

Programs contracted for under this Article are intended to prevent abuse and neglect of juveniles. Abuse and neglect prevention programs are defined to be those programs and services which impact on juveniles and families before any substantiated incident of abuse or neglect has occurred. These programs may include, but are not limited to:

Community-based educational programs on prenatal care, perinatal bonding, child development, basic child care, care of children with special needs, and coping with family stress; and

Community-based programs relating to crisis care, aid to parents, and support groups for parents and their children experiencing stress within the family unit.

No more than twenty percent (20%) of each year’s total awards may be utilized for funding State-level programs to coordinate community-based programs.

History.

1983, c. 894, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 677, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 2009-451, s. 10.43(b).

§ 7B-1302.
Children’s Trust Fund.

There is established a fund to be known as the “Children’s Trust Fund,” in the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, which shall be funded by a portion of the marriage license fee under

G.S. 161-11.1

and a portion of the special license plate fee under

G.S. 20-81.12

. The money in the Fund shall be used by the Division of Social Services to fund abuse and neglect prevention programs so authorized by this Article.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall report annually on revenues and expenditures of the Children’s Trust Fund to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.

History.

1983, c. 894, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-277, s. 5; 2004-124, s. 7.33(b); 2009-451, s. 10.43(c); 2010-31, s. 10.20A(a).

Cross References.

As to fees for Children’s Trust Fund, see

G.S. 161-11.1

.